Washington statutes.
RCW 36.45.010

Manner of filing.

All claims for damages against any county shall be filed in the manner set forth in chapter 4.96 RCW.

[ 1993 c 449 s 10; 1967 c 164 s 14; 1963 c 4 s 36.45.010. Prior: 1957 c 224 s 7; prior: 1919 c 149 s 1, part; RRS s 4077, part.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Severability—1993 c 449: See notes following RCW 4.96.010.

Severability—Purpose—1967 c 164: See notes following RCW 4.96.010.

Tortious conduct of political subdivisions and municipal corporations, liability for damages: Chapter 4.96 RCW.